Utah statutes.
20A-7-610.   Return and canvass -- Conflicting measures -- Law effective on proclamation.

(1)  The votes on the law proposed by the referendum petition shall be counted, canvassed, and delivered as provided in Title 20A, Chapter 4, Part 3, Canvassing Returns.

(2)  After the local board of canvassers completes its canvass, the local clerk shall certify to the local legislative body the vote for and against the law proposed by the referendum petition.

(3) (a)  The local legislative body shall immediately issue a proclamation that:

(i)  gives the total number of votes cast in the local jurisdiction for and against each law proposed by a referendum petition; and

(ii)  declares those laws proposed by a referendum petition that were approved by majority vote to be in full force and effect as the law of the local jurisdiction.

(b)  When the local legislative body determines that two proposed laws, or that parts of two proposed laws approved by the people at the same election are entirely in conflict, they shall proclaim that measure to be law that has received the greatest number of affirmative votes, regardless of the difference in the majorities which those measures have received.

(4) (a)  Within 10 days after the local legislative body's proclamation, any qualified voter who signed the referendum petition proposing the law that is declared by the local legislative body to be superseded by another measure approved at the same election may apply to the Supreme Court to review the decision.

(b)  The Supreme Court shall:

(i)  consider the matter and decide whether or not the proposed laws are in conflict; and

(ii)  certify its decision to the local legislative body.

(5)  Within 10 days after the Supreme Court certifies its decision, the local legislative body shall:

(a)  proclaim all those measures approved by the people as law that the Supreme Court has determined are not in conflict; and

(b)  of all those measures approved by the people as law that the Supreme Court has determined to be in conflict, proclaim as law the one that received the greatest number of affirmative votes, regardless of difference in majorities.

